California statutes. Education Code
(c) (1) If a provisional appointment is made within the 60-day period, the registered voters of the district may, within 30 days from the date of the appointment, petition for the conduct of a special election to fill the vacancy. A petition shall be deemed to bear a sufficient number of signatures if signed by at least the number of registered voters of the district equal to
 112 percent of the number of registered voters of the district at the time of the last regular election for governing board members, or 25 registered voters, whichever is greater. However, in districts with less than 2,000 registered voters, a petition shall be deemed to bear a sufficient number of signatures if signed by at least 5 percent of the number of registered voters of the district at the time of the last regular election for governing board members.

(2) (A) The petition shall be submitted to the county superintendent of schools
 having jurisdiction who shall have 30 days to verify the signatures. If the petition is determined to be legally sufficient by the county superintendent of schools, the provisional appointment is terminated, and the county superintendent of schools shall order a special election to be conducted not less than 88, nor more than 125, days following the order of the election.

(B) Notwithstanding subparagraph (A), the election may be conducted within 180 days
 after the issuance of the order so that the election may be consolidated with a regularly scheduled election.

(3) For purposes of this section, “registered voters” means the following:

(A) If the district uses the at-large method of election, as defined in subdivision (a) of Section 14026 of the Elections Code, registered voters of the entire school district or community college district.

(B) If the district uses district-based elections, as defined in subdivision (b) of Section 14026 of the Elections Code, registered voters of the election district.

(d) A provisional appointment made pursuant to subdivision (a) confers all powers and duties
 of a governing board member upon the appointee immediately following that appointment.

(e) A person appointed to fill a vacancy shall hold office only until the next regularly scheduled election for district governing board members that is scheduled 130 or more days after the effective date of the vacancy, whereupon an election shall be held to fill the vacancy for the remainder of the unexpired term. A person elected at an election to fill the vacancy shall hold office for the remainder of the term in which the vacancy occurs or will occur.

(f) (1) If a petition calling for a special election is circulated, the petition shall meet all of the following requirements:

(A) The petition shall contain the
 election official’s estimate of the cost of conducting the special election and those estimated costs expressed on a per-pupil or per-student basis.

(B) The name and residence address of at least one, but not more than five, of the proponents of the petition shall appear on the petition, each of which proponents shall be a registered voter of the school district or community college district, as applicable.

(C) None of the text or other language of the petition shall appear in less than six-point type.

(D) The petition shall be prepared and circulated in conformity with Sections 100 and 104 of the Elections Code.

(2) If any of the requirements of this subdivision
 are not met as to any petition calling for a special election, the county superintendent of schools shall not verify the signatures, nor shall any further action be taken with respect to the petition.

(3) No person shall permit the list of names on petitions prescribed by this section to be used for any purpose other than qualification of the petition for the purpose of holding an election pursuant to this section.

(4) The petition filed with the county superintendent of schools shall be subject to the restrictions in Article 2 (commencing with Section 7924.100) of Chapter 2 of Part 5 of Division 10 of Title 1 of the Government Code.

(g) Elections held pursuant to subdivisions (b) and (c) shall be conducted in as
 nearly the same manner as practicable as other governing board member elections.

(History: Amended (as amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 615, Sec. 60) by Stats. 2022, Ch. 831, Sec. 1.   (SB 1061)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

5092.

(a) If a provisional appointment is made to the governing board of a school district to fill a vacancy that occurs or will occur pursuant to Section 5091, the board shall, within 10 days of the provisional
 appointment, provide notice of both the actual vacancy or the filing of a deferred resignation and also the provisional appointment by all of the following methods:

(1) Posting the notice in three public places in the school district.

(2) Publishing the notice pursuant to Section 6061 of the Government Code. If there is no newspaper of general circulation published in the district, notice need not be published.

(3) Posting the notice on the school district’s internet website.

(b) The notice shall state
 all of the following:

(1) The fact of the vacancy or resignation.

(2) The date of the occurrence of the vacancy or the date of the filing of, and the effective date of, the resignation.

(3) The full name of the provisional appointee to the board and the date of the provisional appointee’s appointment.

(4) That unless a petition calling for a special election, containing a sufficient number of signatures, is filed in the office of county superintendent of schools within 30 days of the date of the provisional appointment, it shall become an effective
 appointment.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2023, Ch. 68, Sec. 1.   (AB 1326)   Effective January 1, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

5093.

(a) There shall be no special election or appointment to fill a vacancy on a governing board if the vacancy occurs within four months of the end of the term of that position.

(b) Section 5091 shall not apply to a vacancy on a governing board if the vacancy occurs, or a resignation specifying a deferred effective date is filed with the county superintendent of schools, during the period between six months and 130 days prior to a regularly scheduled governing board election and the position is not scheduled to be filled at such election. In such a case, the position shall be filled at a special election for that position to be consolidated with the regular election. A person elected to fill a position under this subdivision shall take office at the next regularly scheduled meeting of the governing board following the certification of the election and shall serve only until the end of the term of the position which he or she was elected to fill.

(c) If a special election pursuant to Section 5091 could be consolidated with the next regular election for governing board members, and the vacant position is scheduled to be filled at such regular election, there shall be no special election.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1984, Ch. 32, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

5094.

If for any reason vacancies should occur in a majority of the offices on any school district or community college district governing board, the president of the county board of education having jurisdiction may appoint members of the county board of education to the district governing board until new members of the governing board are elected or appointed.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

5095.

Whenever any of the offices on any school district governing board or community college district governing board is vacant, the remaining governing board member or members, if any, and any governing board member or members elected or appointed to fill the vacancies, who have qualified, shall have all the powers and perform all the duties of the governing board.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 2. Boards of Education [5200. - 5231.]



  ARTICLE 1. Districts Governed [5200. - 5208.]

5200.

Any unified school district that is coterminous with or includes within its boundaries a chartered city or city and county shall be governed by the board of education provided for in the charter of the city or city and county. Sections 5000, 5017, 5090, 5091, 35013, 35101, and 35105 shall not apply to such unified school districts, except as follows:

(a) As provided in the charter of the city or city and county.

(b) If the charter of the city or city and county fails to provide for a board of education or for any or all of the matters specified in Sections 5000, 5017, 5090, 5091, 5222, 35013, 35101, and 35105, those sections shall apply as to
 the matter not provided for in the charter.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2010, Ch. 89, Sec. 4.   (AB 2081)   Effective January 1, 2011.)
-------------------------------------------

5201.

A school district, or community college district a portion of which is embraced within the limits of any city governed by a charter proposed and adopted as provided by Section 5 of Article XI of the California Constitution, may be subject to, controlled, and governed by the provisions of the charter relating to and providing for the management of public schools in the manner hereinafter in this article provided, upon approval of a majority of the electors of the districts voting at a regular biennial school district governing board member election.

The governing board of any such district may, in the resolution specifying the order of any such regular governing board member election, require that the question of whether the district shall be governed by the provisions of the charter be submitted to the voters of the district.

If the governing board so requires, the ballots used at the election shall contain the words “Shall the (name of district) be governed by the charter of the City of ____?” and the words “Yes” and “No” so placed that the voters may clearly indicate their choice in this connection.

If it appears from the returns that a majority of the votes cast on the proposition is in favor of the proposal, then the county superintendent of schools having jurisdiction shall certify the result to the board of education provided for in the charter of the city. From and after the date of the certificate the district shall be governed by the provisions of the charter relating to the establishment, management, and control of the public schools, and all of the qualified electors residing in the district, whether residing within or without the boundaries of the city, shall be entitled to vote for members of the board of education at any election held for that purpose.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

5202.

If any school district or community college district or portion of any such district is embraced within the corporate limits of a city having a charter, and the electors of the district have participated in and voted at any school election held subsequent to the adoption of and under the provisions of the charter, they shall be deemed to have submitted to be governed in all matters relating to the management of public schools within the school district or high school district or community college district as fully and to all intents and purposes as though the electors of the district had by their votes elected to be governed by the provisions of the charter.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

5203.

If the charter of any city provides for or has within two years prior to January 1, 1955, provided for a board of education of five members of a unified school district, and such charter has been or is hereafter amended so that it fails to provide for a board of education, a new board of education composed of five members is created under this section immediately upon the effective date of such amendment; the positions thereto shall be filled by appointment of the county superintendent of schools. The terms of the members first so appointed shall expire the first Friday in December of an odd-numbered year next following the effective date of such charter amendment, and an election shall be held for the members of such board at the time fixed by law for the regular election of members of governing boards of school districts, and the members so elected shall assume office on the first Friday in December following. If the effective date of such charter amendment is such that a legal election for board members cannot be held as aforesaid prior to the first day of December of an odd-numbered year next following such charter amendment, then the county superintendent of schools shall again appoint the members of such board who shall assume office on the first Friday in December as aforesaid. The terms of the board members who take office on the first Friday in December as aforesaid and thereafter shall be as follows:

(a) If such members were elected, the three receiving the largest number of votes shall serve for four-year terms, and the remaining two members shall serve for two-year terms; and all subsequent members shall serve for four-year terms. 

(b) If such members were appointed, the county superintendent of schools, upon making the appointments, shall designate three members to serve for four-year terms, and two members to serve for two-year terms.

Except as herein otherwise provided, the members of the board shall be elected at the last time fixed by law for the election of members of governing boards of school districts prior to the commencement of a new term of office. If a general municipal election is to be held within 60 days prior to the time when an election for board members would be held as aforesaid, the board of education may, by resolution filed with the governing body of such city at least 60 days prior to such municipal election, call the school district election to coincide with the municipal election and request the governing body of such city to consolidate such elections in that portion of the school district which lies within such city, and the governing body of such city shall order such elections to be consolidated and to be held as are consolidated elections under the provisions of the Elections Code relating to consolidated elections, in which event the school district shall simultaneously with the holding of such consolidated election conduct an election in any portion of the district not included within such municipality. In the event of the holding of such consolidated election, the school district shall reimburse the city for its proportionate share of the costs of conducting such consolidated election in an amount to be agreed upon between the governing bodies of such school district and such city.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1990, Ch. 1161, Sec. 8.   Effective September 21, 1990.)
-------------------------------------------

5203.6.

If the Charter of the City of San Leandro is amended so that it no longer provides for a board of education of the San Leandro Unified School District, a new board of education composed of seven members is created under this section immediately upon the effective date of such amendment. The San Leandro Unified School District shall be divided into six trustee areas as had been provided in the Charter of the City of San Leandro, and the members thereof shall be elected in the same manner as provided in the Charter of the City of San Leandro, before the effective date of such amendment. The members of the board in office on the effective date of the charter amendments shall each continue in office until the first day of April, or until a successor qualifies therefor, in the year in which their respective term of office would otherwise have terminated.

(History: Added by Stats. 1978, Ch. 734.)
-------------------------------------------

5204.

Proceedings pursuant to Section 5203 may be conducted in conjunction with proceedings under Article 1 (commencing with Section 5000) of Chapter 1 of this part, including proceedings by the county committee on school district organization to establish trustee areas or to increase the number of members of the governing board of the school district or community college district from five to seven members, or both. In the event that the number of members of the governing board of the school district is so increased from five to seven members, the terms of office of the board members who take office at the expiration of the terms of office of the board members appointed by the county superintendent of schools shall be determined by lot. The terms of office of the majority of members of the board shall expire on the first Friday in December of the second succeeding odd-numbered year, and the terms of the other members shall expire on the first Friday in December of the first succeeding odd-numbered year. All subsequent members shall serve for four-year terms.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1990, Ch. 1161, Sec. 9.   Effective September 21, 1990.)
-------------------------------------------

5205.

The governing board of any elementary school district having an average daily attendance of 1,000 or more pupils and an assessed valuation of twenty million dollars ($20,000,000) or more may, and upon petition signed by 25 percent of the heads of families resident in the district, shall order an election to determine whether or not, it shall have the rights, powers, and duties of a city board of education and whether or not the district shall for all purposes be deemed to be a district governed by a city board of education.

If the governing board of the district consists of three members, there shall be elected at the election, to take office if the proposal for change in the rights, powers, and duties of the board is approved, two additional members to the board. If the change is approved by a majority of the qualified electors voting on the proposition at the election, the board shall have the rights, powers, and duties of a city board of education, and the district shall for all purposes be deemed to be a district governed by a city board of education. Also, if the change is so approved, the two additional board members shall take office, the one receiving the highest number of votes to serve until the first day of April following the second succeeding regular election at which board members are elected, and the one receiving the next highest number of votes to serve until the first of April following the next such regular election. Thereafter, the governing board of the district shall consist of five members elected in the manner prescribed for other school districts for terms of four years and until their successors are qualified, provided that vacancies shall be filled in the manner provided for unified school districts.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

5206.

Whenever a unified school district has within its boundaries a chartered city or a city with a population of more than 8,000 or whenever the average daily attendance of a unified school district is 1,500 or more, for all purposes the district shall be deemed a city school district governed by a city board of education and the governing board thereof shall be deemed a city board of education.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

5207.

Notwithstanding the provisions of Section 5206, whenever the average daily attendance of a unified school district, which becomes effective for all purposes on or after July 1, 1966, is 2,000 or more, for all purposes the district shall be deemed a city school district governed by a city board of education and the governing board thereof shall be deemed a city board of education.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

5208.

When outside territory has been annexed to a city for school purposes, the outside territory shall be deemed to be a part of the city for all matters connected with the school department of the city, for the annual levying and collecting of the property tax for the school fund of the city, and for all purposes specified in Chapter 2 (commencing with Section 15100) of Part 10 of this division.

The last assessment roll made by the county assessor shall be the only basis of taxation for the school district on the property outside the corporate limits annexed for school purposes.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. Elections [5220. - 5231.]

5220.

Boards of education are elected in cities under the provisions of the laws governing the respective cities, except as otherwise provided in this chapter.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

5221.

Whenever the charter of a city comprising in whole or in part an elementary school district, fails to provide for the manner in which, the times at which, and the terms for which the members of the board of education of such city are appointed, and for the number which shall constitute such board, the governing board of the elementary school district within which the city is located or with which the city is coterminous is the board of education of the city.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

5222.

Except as provided in Section 5221, whenever the charter of any city fails to provide for the manner in which, the times at which, or the terms for which the members of the city board of education shall be elected or appointed, for their qualifications, removal, or for the number which shall constitute such board, the provisions of this division shall apply to the matter not provided for.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

5223.

The members of any elective city board of education shall be elected at large from the territory within the boundaries of the school district or districts which are under the jurisdiction of the city board of education, whether sitting as a board of education, high school board, or community college board, and any qualified elector of the territory shall be eligible to be a member of such city board of education.

When outside territory has been annexed to a city for school purposes it shall be deemed a part of the city for the purpose of holding the general municipal election, and shall form one or more election precincts, as may be determined by the legislative authority of the city. The qualified electors of the annexed territory shall vote only for the board of education or the board of school trustees.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

5225.

Notwithstanding Section 5033, when a unified school district is formed pursuant to Chapter 4 (commencing with Section 35700) of Part 21 of Division 3 of Title 2, which includes a city school district having a city board of education as provided under former Section 5224 as it existed on January 1, 2017, the unified school district shall be governed by that city board of
 education, and the governing board members thereof shall continue in office for the remainder of their terms as elected pursuant to former Section 5224 as it existed on January 1, 2017.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2017, Ch. 243, Sec. 3.   (SB 628)   Effective January 1, 2018.)
-------------------------------------------

5227.

In those cases in which the boundaries of the school district, high school district, or community college district, governed by a city board of education, are not coterminous with the boundaries of the city, and where elections, either primary, general, or recall, of members of the board of education are by the provisions of the laws governing the cities held at times other than on the day of municipal elections, general or special, the cost and expense of the district elections shall be a legal charge against the funds of the district or districts governed by the board of education. The city shall be reimbursed by the district or districts for its actual cost and expense incurred in the conduct of the election or elections. The cost and expense of conducting the election in territory common to two or more districts shall be borne by the districts in equal shares. In territory within a single district the cost shall be borne by the district.

In those cases in which the school district, high school district, or community college district is governed by a city board of education, and elections, either primary, general, or recall, of members of the board of education are by the provisions of the laws governing the cities held on the same day as municipal elections, general or special, a proportionate part of the actual cost and expense of the election shall be a legal charge against the school districts governed by the board of education. The city shall be reimbursed for the proportionate cost and expense incurred in the conduct of the election. The cost and expense of the elections within the boundaries of the city shall be apportioned between the city and the districts in the ratio that the total number of offices to be filled and propositions to be voted upon by the electors of the city and the school district or districts, respectively, bears to the total number of offices to be filled and propositions submitted. The cost and expense of the election in territory outside of the municipal boundaries shall be borne by the districts affected. As between the districts, costs and expense shall be apportioned as follows: In territory common to two or more districts the cost of conducting the election shall be borne in equal shares, and in territory within a single district the cost shall be borne by the district.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

5228.

An election for members of the governing board of a community college district which has been divided into wards as provided in Section 5227 may be held, at the discretion of the governing board, on the same date and in the same manner as the city election for any chartered city located within the boundaries of the community college district. Such election when held shall be conducted by the chartered city on behalf of the community college district with the expenses of the election within the boundaries of the city apportioned between the city and the school districts in the manner prescribed by Section 5227.

Where a city charter does not specify a date for such elections, city boards of education may, by unanimous vote, determine that governing board member elections for that district shall be held on the date prescribed for the regular biennial school district governing board member elections, in which event the provisions of Chapter 3 (commencing with Section 5300) of this part relating to the consolidation of governing board member elections shall apply.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

5229.

(a) (1) If a unified school district governed by a board of education of five members includes a chartered city, the charter of which provides for a board of education, the members of which are to be elected pursuant to this code and to hold office for the terms provided by this code, and three members of that board of education were elected to hold office for a term expiring during the school year commencing on the date the district was formed for all purposes, the office of three members of the board of education shall be filled at the first election of governing board members following the date of formation for all purposes.

(2) The term of office of the three
 members elected pursuant to paragraph (1) shall be determined by lot. The term of one member shall expire on the first Friday in December of the first succeeding odd-numbered year following his or her election; and the terms of two members shall expire on the first Friday in December of the second succeeding odd-numbered year following their election. The persons elected to succeed the three members shall hold office for four years.

(b) In a unified school district formed pursuant to Chapter 4 (commencing with Section 35700) of Part 21 of Division 3 of Title 2, which includes a chartered city, the governing board of the school district shall be the board of education of such city or city and county, provided that all qualified electors residing within the unified school district are eligible to vote at all elections held for the election of members of the city board of education and any elector residing in the district, or in a trustee area if
 the district is divided into trustee areas, is eligible to serve as a member of that board.

(c) In the event a unified district includes a chartered city, the governing board of the unified school district shall consist of either five or seven members, and shall be elected at large or by trustee areas, as designated by the unification proposal, and any elector residing in the district, or in a trustee area if the district is divided into trustee areas, is eligible to serve as a member of the board. The first governing board of any such unified school district shall be elected in the manner prescribed by Section 35101, except where the charter of the included chartered city expressly provides for the election of the first governing board of a newly formed unified school district, in which case those provisions of the charter shall control the election of the governing board.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2015, Ch. 386, Sec. 2.   (SB 436)   Effective January 1, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------

5230.

In the event a newly unified district includes a chartered city, the first governing board of the district shall be selected pursuant to Section 35101 or, in the event the charter of such city expressly provides for the calling and setting of the election of the first governing board of a newly unified school district, the charter shall apply.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

5231.

Notwithstanding any other provision of law, when elections for school district governing board members in existing or newly formed school districts are conducted in conjunction with the municipal election of a chartered city on other than the first Tuesday after the first Monday in November, newly elected members, unless the charter provides otherwise, shall take office 37 days after the day of election; provided, however, if the charter of a city provides for a municipal nominating or primary election and a general municipal election, the newly elected members shall take office 37 days after the date fixed by the charter for the general municipal election. The terms of office of outgoing members shall expire on the day before such newly elected members take office.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1979, Ch. 9.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 3. Conduct of Elections [5300. - 5442.]



  ARTICLE 1. General Provisions [5300. - 5304.]

5300.

School district elections and community college district elections shall be governed by the Elections Code, except as otherwise provided in this code.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

5301.

The provisions of this chapter shall apply to all district elections, except as otherwise provided by law, or as otherwise provided in the charter of any city or city and county in the matters concerning which the provisions of such charters are afforded controlling force and effect by the Constitution or laws of the state.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

5302.

The duties of the county superintendent of schools having jurisdiction of a school district election or community college district election shall be:

(a) To call elections when ordered under the provisions of this code.

(b) To prepare recommendations, statements, or arguments for any election in which they are required, as provided in this code.

(c) To receive petitions as authorized by this code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1977, Ch. 747.)
-------------------------------------------

5303.

The county elections official shall perform the duties incident to the preparation for, and holding of, all district elections.

In districts situated in two or more counties, or in elections to organize or reorganize districts in territory situated in two or more counties, the county elections officials in the counties in which any part of the district territory is situated, shall, by mutual agreement, provide for the performance of those duties.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2002, Ch. 221, Sec. 5.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------

5304.

The duties of the governing board of any school district or community college district with respect to school district elections shall be:

(a) To order elections as authorized by this code.

(b) To resolve tie votes in governing board member elections.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. Order and Call of Elections [5320. - 5329.]

5320.

The act authorized by this code of any officer, board, county committee, group of electors, or any other persons or agencies which commences an election proceeding, and any mandatory provision of this code requiring that an election be held, is an “order of election.”

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

5321.

Whenever a valid and verified petition, authorized by this code and requesting that a board election be held in any school district or in territory contained in one or more school districts or community college district, is received by the officer or board designated by law to receive the petition, such petition shall be deemed an order for calling such election unless the officer or board is by law authorized to take some action upon the petition other than ordering the election requested in the petition. If an election is ordered, the county superintendent having jurisdiction shall prepare a resolution setting forth the specifications required in Section 5322 as preliminary procedure to the call of such election.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

5322.

Whenever an election is ordered, the governing board of the district or the board or officer authorized by this code to make such designations shall, concurrently with or after the order of election but not less than 123 days prior to the date of the election in the case of an election for governing board members, or at least 88 days prior to the date of the election in the case of an election on a measure, including a bond measure, by resolution delivered to the county superintendent of schools and the officer conducting the election, or, in the case of an election on a measure, only to the officer conducting the election, specify the following, or such of the following as he or she or it may have authority to designate:

(a) The date of the election.

(b) The purpose of the election.

The resolution or resolutions shall be known as “specifications of the election order” and shall set forth the authority for ordering the election, the authority for the specification of the election order, the signature of the officer or the clerk of the board by law authorized to make the designations therein contained, and, in the case of an election on a measure, the exact wording of the measure as it is to appear on the ballot. Pursuant to Section 13247 of the Elections Code, the statement of the measure to appear on the ballot shall not exceed 75 words.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2000, Ch. 1081, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2001.)
-------------------------------------------

5323.

The county superintendent having jurisdiction shall at least 130 days prior to the date of a governing board member election consolidated pursuant to Section 5340, notify the governing boards concerned of the order of consolidation of governing board elections under his or her jurisdiction. Such notice of consolidation shall be given in writing.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1982, Ch. 428, Sec. 5.)
-------------------------------------------

5324.

At least 120 days prior to the date of the election in the case of an election for governing board members, the county superintendent of schools shall deliver to the county elections official in the county where the election is to be held, copies of:

(a) The order of election.

(b) The formal notice of election.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2002, Ch. 221, Sec. 6.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------

5325.

Any school district election or community college district election, except a bond measure election, ordered to be held in accordance with this code shall be called by the county superintendent of schools having jurisdiction of the election by doing both of the following:

(a) Posting or publication of notices of election.

(b) Delivery of a copy of the formal notice of election to the county elections official at least 120 days prior to the date of the election in the case of an election for governing board members.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2002, Ch. 221, Sec. 7.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------

5326.

If, by 5:00 p.m. on the 83rd day prior to the day fixed for the governing board member election, only one person has been nominated for any elective office to be filled at that election, or no one has been nominated for the office, or in the case of members to be elected from the district at large, the number of candidates for governing board member at large does not exceed the number of offices to be filled at that election, or in the case of members to be nominated by trustee area and elected at large, the number of candidates do not exceed the number required to be elected governing board member at large nominated by that trustee area, or in the case of members to be elected at large in accordance with Sections 5030.5 , 5030.6, and 5030.7, no more than one person has been nominated for each membership position, and a petition signed by 10 percent of the voters or 50 voters, whichever is the smaller number, in the district or trustee area, if elected by trustee area, requesting that a school district election be held for the offices has not been presented to the officer conducting the election, appointment will be made as prescribed by Section 5328.

The provisions of this section and Section 5328 shall also apply to elections for membership on a county board of education.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1996, Ch. 48, Sec. 2.   Effective May 15, 1996.)
-------------------------------------------

5328.

If pursuant to Section 5326 a district election is not held, the qualified person or persons nominated shall be seated at the organizational meeting of the board, or if no person has been nominated or if an insufficient number is nominated, the governing board shall appoint a qualified person or persons, as the case may be, at a meeting prior to the day fixed for the election, and such appointee or appointees shall be seated at the organizational meeting of the board as if elected at a district election.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1978, Ch. 22.)
-------------------------------------------

5328.5.
